Maryland, session 2026, SB0615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0615*

SENATE BILL 615
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–26.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for future major
repairs and replacement of the common elements of a cooperative housing corporation that:
(i) Using an itemized list, clearly identifies each structural,
mechanical, electrical, and plumbing component of the common elements and any other
components that:
1. Are the responsibility of the cooperative housing
corporation to repair and replace; and
2. If applicable, meet a minimum cost of repair or
replacement, as determined by the governing body, that is:
A. Reasonably based on the expenses of the cooperative
housing corporation; and
B. Not a minor expense that is otherwise addressed by the
budget of the cooperative housing corporation;
(ii) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
(iii) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component;
(iv) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to BE
ADDED TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT TO accomplish any identified future repair or
replacement OF AN IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE COMPONENT REACHES THE
END OF THE COMPONENT’S USEFUL LIFE; and
(v) States the quantity or size of each identified component using the
appropriate measurement, such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(3) “Updated reserve study” means, for the common elements since the
prior reserve study was completed within the previous 5 years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement cost, remaining life, and useful life
estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and

SENATE BILL 615 3
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(b) (1) This subsection applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the cooperative housing corporation shall have
an independent reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the first
meeting of the cooperative housing corporation at which the members other than the owner
have a majority of votes in the cooperative housing corporation.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection, which shall be updated at least every 5 years thereafter.
(c) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a cooperative housing corporation
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 615
(3) (i) This paragraph applies to a cooperative housing corporation
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have
an updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has
not had a reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall
have a reserve study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study
at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) Each reserve study and updated reserve study required under this section
shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the cooperative housing
corporation in connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(e) To the extent that a reserve study conducted in accordance with this section
indicates a need to budget for reserves, the GOVERNING BODY OF A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION SHALL ADOPT AN ANNUAL budget [shall include] THAT
INCLUDES:
(1) For the capital components IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE STUDY, the
current estimated:

SENATE BILL 615 5
(i) Replacement cost CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY; AND
(ii) Remaining [life; and
(iii) Useful] USEFUL life CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;
(2) The amount of [accumulated]:
(I) ACCUMULATED cash reserves set aside for the repair[,] OR
replacement[, or restoration] of capital components IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE STUDY
as of the beginning of the fiscal year in which the reserve study is conducted; and [the
amount of the]
(II) THE expected contribution to the reserve fund for the fiscal year
CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;
(3) A statement describing the procedures used for estimation and
accumulation of cash reserves in accordance with this section; and
(4) A statement of the amount of reserves recommended in the RESERVE
study and the amount of current cash for replacement reserves.
(f) (1) [(i) 1.] Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection [and
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph], the governing body of a cooperative housing
corporation shall deposit funds to the reserve account in accordance with the [most recent
reserve study or updated reserve study and the funding plan required under subsection (g)
of this section on or before the last day of each fiscal year and shall review the reserves and
the most recent reserve study or updated reserve study annually to determine whether
there is adequate funding in accordance with the funding plan required under subsection
(g) of this section.
2. The annual review under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph does not require a reserve study or updated reserve study in addition to the
reserve study requirements under subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the most recent
reserve study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within 5 fiscal years
following the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed, attain the annual
reserve funding level recommended in the initial reserve study in accordance with the
funding plan under subsection (g) of this section] ANNUAL BUDGET ADOPTED BY THE
COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (i) The [governing body] MEMBERS of a cooperative housing
corporation may determine by a two–thirds majority vote that the cooperative housing

SENATE BILL 615
corporation and the members are experiencing a financial hardship that limits the ability
to fund reserves that are required under paragraph [(1)(i) or (ii)] (1) of this subsection.
(ii) Subject to [subparagraphs (iii) through (v)] SUBPARAGRAPH
(III) of this paragraph, if [a governing body makes] THE MEMBERS OF A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION MAKE a financial hardship determination [based on the reserve
funding requirements of paragraph (1)(i) or (ii) of this subsection:
1. The] IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE cooperative housing corporation may reasonably deviate from that
reserve funding requirement[; and
2. The funding level under that requirement shall be at least
the funding amount necessary for the purposes specified under subsection (g)(3) of this
section].
(iii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, a cooperative housing corporation may not deviate from the reserve funding
requirements of paragraph [(1)(i) or (ii)] (1) of this subsection for a period of more than 1
fiscal year following the financial hardship determination.
2. The [governing body] MEMBERS OF A COOPERATIVE
HOUSING CORPORATION may renew a financial hardship determination under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph by a two–thirds majority vote to extend the period that
a cooperative housing corporation may deviate from the reserve funding requirement by 1
fiscal year following the renewal.
(iv) IF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION DEVIATES
FROM A RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT WITH RESPECT TO A CAPITAL
COMPONENT IDENTIFIED IN A RESERVE STUDY, THE NEW ESTIMATED ANNUAL
AMOUNT THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION IS REQUIRED TO ADD TO THE
RESERVE ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESERVE STUDY SHALL BE
RECALCULATED SO THAT THE RESERVE ACCOUNT WILL HAVE SUFFICIENT MONEY
TO REPAIR OR REPLACE AN IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE COMPONENT
REACHES THE END OF ITS USEFUL LIFE.
(V) The governing body shall:
1. Make good faith efforts to resolve the financial hardship
and resume funding reserves as required under paragraph [(1)(i) or (ii)] (1) of this
subsection;
2. Maintain detailed documentation of the good faith efforts
made under item 1 of this subparagraph; and

SENATE BILL 615 7
3. Treat the documents under item 2 of this subparagraph as
records for examination and copying under § 5–6B–26 of this subtitle.
[(v)] (VI) 1. All members shall be given reasonable notice in
advance of a vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship determination under
this paragraph.
2. A vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship
determination under this paragraph may be taken only at a regular or special meeting of
the cooperative housing corporation.
[(3) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation has the
authority to increase an assessment levied to cover the reserve funding amount required
under this section, notwithstanding any provision of the articles of incorporation, bylaws,
or proprietary lease restricting assessment increases or capping the assessment that may
be levied in a fiscal year.
(g) (1) The governing body of a cooperative housing corporation shall, in
consultation with a person identified under subsection (d)(1) of this section, develop a
funding plan to determine how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common elements of the cooperative
housing corporation that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and

SENATE BILL 615
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body shall review progress toward compliance with the
funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual meeting of the governing
body.]
Article – Real Property
11–109.2.
(a) The council of unit owners shall cause to be prepared and submitted to the
unit owners an annual proposed budget at least 30 days before its adoption.
(b) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves; and
(7) Capital items.
(c) (1) [Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection and] THE
COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS OF THE CONDOMINIUM ASSOCIATION SHALL DEPOSIT
FUNDS TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT in accordance with the funding plan under §
11–109.4(f) of this title[, the reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection
(b) of this section for a residential condominium shall:
(i) Be the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve
study or updated reserve study completed under § 11–109.4 of this title; and
(ii) Be deposited in the reserve account on or before the last day of
each fiscal year.

SENATE BILL 615 9
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the most recent reserve
study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within 5 fiscal years following
the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve
funding level recommended in the initial reserve study in accordance with the funding plan
under § 11–109.4(f) of this title].
[(3)] (2) (i) The [governing body of a residential condominium]
COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS may determine by a two–thirds majority vote that the
condominium and the unit owners are experiencing a financial hardship that limits the
ability to fund reserves that are required under paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection.
(ii) Subject to [subparagraphs (iii) through (v)] SUBPARAGRAPH
(III) of this paragraph, if a governing body makes a financial hardship determination
[based on the reserve funding requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection:
1. The] IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE condominium may reasonably deviate from that reserve funding
requirement[; and
2. The funding level under that requirement shall be at least
the funding amount necessary for the purposes specified under § 11–109.4(f)(3) of this title].
(iii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, a residential condominium may not deviate from the reserve funding
[requirements] REQUIREMENT of paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection for a period of
more than 1 fiscal year following the financial hardship determination.
2. The [governing body] UNIT OWNERS may renew a
financial hardship determination under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph by a two–thirds
majority vote to extend the period that a residential condominium may deviate from the
reserve funding requirement by 1 fiscal year following the renewal.
(iv) IF A CONDOMINIUM DEVIATES FROM A RESERVE FUNDING
REQUIREMENT WITH RESPECT TO A CAPITAL COMPONENT IDENTIFIED IN A
RESERVE STUDY, THE NEW ESTIMATED ANNUAL AMOUNT THE CONDOMINIUM IS
REQUIRED TO ADD TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESERVE
STUDY SHALL BE RECALCULATED SO THAT THE RESERVE ACCOUNT WILL HAVE
SUFFICIENT MONEY TO REPAIR OR REPLACE AN IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE
COMPONENT REACHES THE END OF ITS USEFUL LIFE.
(V) The governing body shall:
1. Make good faith efforts to resolve the financial hardship
and resume funding reserves as required under paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection;

SENATE BILL 615
2. Maintain detailed documentation of the good faith efforts
made under item 1 of this subparagraph; and
3. Treat the documents under item 2 of this subparagraph as
records available for examination and copying under § 11–116 of this title.
[(v)] (VI) 1. All unit owners shall be given reasonable notice in
advance of a vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship determination under
this paragraph.
2. A vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship
determination under this paragraph may be taken only at a regular or special meeting of
the condominium.
[(4)] (3) (i) The governing body of a residential condominium shall
annually review the reserves and the most recent reserve study or updated reserve study
to determine whether there is adequate funding in accordance with the funding plan
required under § 11–109.4(f) of this title.
(ii) The annual review under this paragraph does not require a
reserve study or updated reserve study in addition to the reserve study requirements under
§ 11–109.4 of this title.
(d) (1) The budget shall be adopted at an open meeting of the council of unit
owners or any other body to which the council of unit owners delegates responsibilities for
preparing and adopting the budget.
(2) (i) The council of unit owners or other governing body of unit owners
shall submit the adopted annual budget to the unit owners not more than 30 days after the
meeting at which the budget was adopted.
(ii) The adopted annual budget may be submitted to each unit owner
by electronic transmission, by posting on the condominium association’s home page, or by
inclusion in the homeowners association’s newsletter.
(e) Any expenditure made other than those made because of conditions which, if
not corrected, could reasonably result in a threat to the health or safety of the unit owners
or a significant risk of damage to the condominium, that would result in an increase in an
amount of assessments for the current fiscal year of the condominium in excess of 15
percent of the budgeted amount previously adopted, shall be approved by an amendment
to the budget adopted at a special meeting, upon not less than 10 days written notice to the
council of unit owners.
(f) The adoption of a budget shall not impair the authority of the council of unit
owners to obligate the council of unit owners for expenditures for any purpose consistent
with any provision of this title.

SENATE BILL 615 11
(g) The provisions of this section do not apply to a condominium that is occupied
and used solely for nonresidential purposes.
11–109.4.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for future major
repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
(i) Using an itemized list, identifies each structural, mechanical,
electrical, and plumbing component of the common elements and any other components
that:
1. Are the responsibility of the council of unit owners to
repair and replace; and
2. If applicable, meet a minimum cost of repair or
replacement, as determined by the governing body, that is:
A. Reasonably based on the expenses of the condominium;
and
B. Not a minor expense that is otherwise addressed by the
budget of the condominium;
(ii) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
(iii) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component;
(iv) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to BE
ADDED TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT TO accomplish any identified future repair or
replacement OF AN IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE COMPONENT REACHES THE
END OF THE COMPONENT’S USEFUL LIFE; and
(v) States the quantity or size of each identified component using the
appropriate measurement, such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(3) “Updated reserve study” means, for the common elements since the
prior reserve study was completed within the previous 5 years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement cost, remaining life, and useful life
estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and

SENATE BILL 615
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(b) This section applies only to a residential condominium.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.

SENATE BILL 615 13
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study and updated reserve study required under this section
shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the condominium in connection
with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(f) [(1) The governing body of a condominium shall, in consultation with a
person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to determine
how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:

SENATE BILL 615
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common elements of the condominium
that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body shall review progress toward compliance with the
funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual meeting of the governing
body] TO THE EXTENT THAT A RESERVE STUDY CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION INDICATES A NEED TO BUDGET FOR RESERVES, THE GOVERNING
BODY OF THE CONDOMINIUM SHALL ADOPT AN ANNUAL BUDGET THAT INCLUDES:
(1) FOR THE CAPITAL COMPONENTS IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY, THE CURRENT ESTIMATED:
(I) REPLACEMENT COST CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;
AND
(II) REMAINING USEFUL LIFE CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF:

SENATE BILL 615 15
(I) ACCUMULATED CASH RESERVES SET ASIDE FOR THE
REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF CAPITAL COMPONENTS IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY AS OF THE BEGINNING OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE RESERVE STUDY
IS CONDUCTED; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE EXPECTED CONTRIBUTION TO THE
RESERVE FUND FOR THE FISCAL YEAR CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;
(3) A STATEMENT DESCRIBING THE PROCEDURES USED FOR
ESTIMATION AND ACCUMULATION OF CASH RESERVES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF RESERVES RECOMMENDED IN
THE RESERVE STUDY AND THE AMOUNT OF CURRENT CASH FOR REPLACEMENT
RESERVES.
11B–112.2.
(a) This section applies only to a homeowners association that has responsibility
under its declaration for maintaining and repairing common areas.
(b) (1) The board of directors or other governing body of a homeowners
association shall cause to be prepared and submitted to the lot owners an annual proposed
budget at least 30 days before its adoption.
(2) The annual proposed budget may be sent to each lot owner by electronic
transmission, by posting on the homeowners association’s home page, or by including the
annual proposed budget in the homeowners association’s newsletter.
(c) The annual budget shall provide for at least the following items:
(1) Income;
(2) Administration;
(3) Maintenance;
(4) Utilities;
(5) General expenses;
(6) Reserves; and
(7) Capital expenses.

SENATE BILL 615
(d) (1) [Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection and] THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL DEPOSIT FUNDS TO
THE RESERVE ACCOUNT in accordance with the funding plan under § 11B–112.3(f) of this
title[, reserves provided for in the annual budget under subsection (c) of this section shall:
(i) Be the funding amount recommended in the most recent reserve
study or updated reserve study completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title; and
(ii) Be deposited in the reserve account on or before the last day of
each fiscal year.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, if the most recent reserve
study was an initial reserve study, the governing body shall, within 5 fiscal years following
the fiscal year in which the initial reserve study was completed, attain the annual reserve
funding level recommended in the initial reserve study in accordance with the funding plan
under § 11B–112.3(f) of this title].
[(3)] (2) (i) The [governing body] LOT OWNERS of a homeowners
association may determine by a two–thirds majority vote that the homeowners association
and the lot owners are experiencing a financial hardship that limits the ability to fund
reserves that are required under paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection.
(ii) Subject to [subparagraphs (iii) through (v)] SUBPARAGRAPH
(III) of this paragraph, if [a governing body makes] THE LOT OWNERS OF A
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION MAKE a financial hardship determination [based on the
reserve funding requirements of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection:
1. The] IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, THE homeowners association may reasonably deviate from that
reserve funding requirement[; and
2. The funding level under that requirement shall be at least
the funding amount necessary for the purposes specified under § 11B–112.3(f)(3) of this
title].
(iii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, a homeowners association may not deviate from the reserve funding
requirements of paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection for a period of more than 1 fiscal
year following the financial hardship determination.
2. The [governing body] LOT OWNERS OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION may renew a financial hardship determination under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph by a two–thirds majority vote to extend the period that a homeowners
association may deviate from the reserve funding requirement by 1 fiscal year following the
renewal.

SENATE BILL 615 17
(iv) IF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION DEVIATES FROM A
RESERVE FUNDING REQUIREMENT WITH RESPECT TO A CAPITAL COMPONENT
IDENTIFIED IN A RESERVE STUDY, THE NEW ESTIMATED ANNUAL AMOUNT THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IS REQUIRED TO ADD TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE RESERVE STUDY SHALL BE RECALCULATED SO THAT THE
RESERVE ACCOUNT WILL HAVE SUFFICIENT MONEY TO REPAIR OR REPLACE AN
IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE COMPONENT REACHES THE END OF ITS USEFUL
LIFE.
(V) The governing body shall:
1. Make good faith efforts to resolve the financial hardship
and resume funding reserves as required under paragraph (1) [or (2)] of this subsection;
2. Maintain detailed documentation of the good faith efforts
made under item 1 of this subparagraph; and
3. Treat the documents under item 2 of this subparagraph as
records for examination and copying under § 11B–112 of this title.
[(v)] (VI) 1. All lot owners shall be given reasonable notice in
advance of a vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship determination under
this paragraph.
2. A vote on an initial or a renewal of a financial hardship
determination under this paragraph may only be taken at a regular or special meeting of
the homeowners association.
[(4)] (3) (i) The governing body of a homeowners association shall
annually review the reserves and the most recent reserve study or updated reserve study
to determine whether there is adequate funding in accordance with the funding plan
required under § 11B–112.3(f) of this title.
(ii) The annual review under this paragraph does not require a
reserve study or updated reserve study in addition to the reserve study requirements under
§ 11B–112.3 of this title.
(e) (1) The budget shall be adopted at an open meeting of the homeowners
association or any other body to which the homeowners association delegates
responsibilities for preparing and adopting the budget.
(2) (i) The board of directors or other governing body of a homeowners
association shall submit the adopted annual budget to the lot owners not more than 30 days
after the meeting at which the budget was adopted.

SENATE BILL 615
(ii) The adopted annual budget may be submitted to each lot owner
by electronic transmission, by posting on the homeowners association’s home page, or by
inclusion in the homeowners association’s newsletter.
(3) (i) Notice of the meeting at which the proposed budget will be
considered shall be sent to each lot owner.
(ii) Notice under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may be sent by
electronic transmission, by posting on the homeowners association’s home page, or by
including the notice in the homeowners association’s newsletter.
(f) Except for an expenditure made by the homeowners association because of a
condition that, if not corrected, could reasonably result in a threat to the health or safety
of the lot owners or a significant risk of damage to the development, any expenditure that
would result in an increase in an amount of assessments for the current fiscal year of the
homeowners association in excess of 15% of the budgeted amount previously adopted shall
be approved by an amendment to the budget adopted at a special meeting for which not
less than 10 days’ written notice or notice by electronic transmission shall be provided to
the lot owners.
(g) The adoption of a budget does not impair the authority of the homeowners
association to obligate the homeowners association for expenditures for any purpose
consistent with any provision of this title.
11B–112.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for future major
repairs and replacement of the common areas of a homeowners association that:
(i) Using an itemized list, identifies each structural, mechanical,
electrical, and plumbing component of the common areas and any other components that:
1. Are the responsibility of the homeowners association to
repair and replace; and
2. If applicable, meet a minimum cost of repair or
replacement, as determined by the governing body, that is:
A. Reasonably based on the expenses of the homeowners
association; and
B. Not a minor expense that is otherwise addressed by the
budget of the homeowners association;

SENATE BILL 615 19
(ii) States the estimated remaining useful life of each identified
component;
(iii) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component;
(iv) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to BE
ADDED TO THE RESERVE ACCOUNT IN ORDER TO accomplish any identified future
repair or replacement OF AN IDENTIFIED COMPONENT WHEN THE COMPONENT
REACHES THE END OF THE COMPONENT’S USEFUL LIFE; and
(v) States the quantity or size of each identified component using the
appropriate measurement, such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(3) “Updated reserve study” means, for the common areas since the prior
reserve study was completed within the previous 5 years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement cost, remaining life, and useful life
estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a homeowners association:
(i) That has responsibility under its declaration for maintaining and
repairing common areas; and
(ii) For which the total repair or replacement costs for all
components identified in subsection (a) of this section is at least $10,000.
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowners association that issues
bonds for the purpose of meeting capital expenditures.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a homeowners association established
in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the homeowners association shall have an
independent reserve study completed not more than 90 calendar days and not less than 30

SENATE BILL 615
calendar days before the meeting of the homeowners association required under §
11B–106.1(a) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.

SENATE BILL 615 21
(e) Each reserve study and updated reserve study required under this section
shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any lot owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the homeowners association in
connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
lot owners.
(f) [(1) The governing body of a homeowners association shall, in consultation
with a person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to
determine how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.

SENATE BILL 615
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common areas of the homeowners
association that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body of a homeowners association shall review progress
toward compliance with the funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual
meeting of the homeowners association] TO THE EXTENT THAT A RESERVE STUDY
CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION INDICATES A NEED TO BUDGET
FOR RESERVES, THE GOVERNING BODY OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL
ADOPT AN ANNUAL BUDGET THAT INCLUDES:
(1) FOR THE CAPITAL COMPONENTS IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY, THE CURRENT ESTIMATED:
(I) REPLACEMENT COST CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;
AND
(II) REMAINING USEFUL LIFE CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF:
(I) ACCUMULATED CASH RESERVES SET ASIDE FOR THE
REPAIR OR REPLACEMENT OF CAPITAL COMPONENTS IDENTIFIED IN THE RESERVE
STUDY AS OF THE BEGINNING OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE RESERVE STUDY
IS CONDUCTED; AND
(II) THE AMOUNT OF THE EXPECTED CONTRIBUTION TO THE
RESERVE FUND FOR THE FISCAL YEAR CALCULATED IN THE RESERVE STUDY;

SENATE BILL 615 23
(3) A STATEMENT DESCRIBING THE PROCEDURES USED FOR
ESTIMATION AND ACCUMULATION OF CASH RESERVES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION; AND
(4) A STATEMENT OF THE AMOUNT OF RESERVES RECOMMENDED IN
THE RESERVE STUDY AND THE AMOUNT OF CURRENT CASH FOR REPLACEMENT
RESERVES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.